Vermont, session 2025-2026, H67.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Purpose and Findings * * *
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
(a) The purpose of this act is to actuate the principle of government
accountability by focusing on how evidence is used to inform policy, how our
State laws are carried out, and how legislation can best be formed to achieve
its intended outcomes. This act strives to systematize government
accountability efforts as much as possible with simple, clear, independent,

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 2 of 14
objective, and fact-based processes rather than to rely upon individual
legislators or individual committees to be effective.
(b) Government accountability means the principle of demanding that
legislation succeeds in achieving its stated policy goals through the provision
of means by which to measure whether the policy goals have been met. The
metrics for determining whether success has been achieved are as important as
the goals themselves.
(c) Government oversight means the mechanisms put into place to ensure
that the bodies of government tasked with executing legislative intent are
properly doing so. Oversight by the General Assembly is the examination of
the processes followed and the information produced by government officials
executing the law to determine whether those officials are properly and
adequately achieving the policy goals established by the General Assembly.
* * * Creation of the Joint Government Oversight and Accountability
Committee * * *
Sec. 2. 2 V.S.A. chapter 28 is added to read:
CHAPTER 28. JOINT GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT AND
ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE
§ 971. CREATION OF COMMITTEE
(a) There is created the Joint Government Oversight and Accountability
Committee, whose membership shall be appointed each biennial session of the

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 3 of 14
General Assembly. The Committee shall work independently and with other
legislative committees to assist with matters related to government oversight
and issues of significant public concern.
(b) The Committee shall be composed of eight members: four members of
the House of Representatives, not more than two of whom shall be from the
same party, appointed by the Speaker of the House; and four members of the
Senate, not more than two of whom shall be from the same party, appointed by
the Committee on Committees. In addition to two members-at-large appointed
from each chamber, one appointment shall be made from each of the House
Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs, the Senate
Committee on Government Operations, and the House and Senate Committees
on Appropriations.
(c) The Committee shall elect a chair, vice chair, and clerk from among its
members and shall adopt rules of procedure. The position of chair shall rotate
biennially between the House and the Senate members. The Committee shall
keep minutes of its meetings and maintain a file thereof. A quorum shall
consist of five members.
(d) The Committee shall meet as necessary for the prompt discharge of its
duties.
(e) For attendance at a meeting when the General Assembly is not in
session, members of the Committee shall be entitled to compensation for

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 4 of 14
services and reimbursement of expenses as provided under subsection 23(a) of
this title.
(f) The professional and clerical services of the Joint Fiscal Office, the
Office of Legislative Operations, and the Office of Legislative Counsel shall
be available to the Committee.
§ 972. DUTIES AND POWERS
(a) Duties. The Committee shall have duties as described in this section
and elsewhere in law.
(1)(A) The Committee shall exercise government oversight by
examining and investigating matters of significant public concern relating to
State government performance. The Committee shall examine the possible
reasons for any failure of government oversight and provide findings and
tangible recommendations to standing committees of jurisdiction to prevent
future failures.
(B) The Committee will select issues of significant public concern to
examine and investigate by a majority of the current Committee members who
have not recused themselves from the matter. The Committee shall consider
issues of significant public concern referred to the Committee pursuant to a
resolution adopted by either chamber of the General Assembly.
(C) As used in this section, an “issue of significant public concern”
means any issue that:

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 5 of 14
(i) affects the State as a whole;
(ii) affects a vulnerable population;
(iii) costs the State more than $100,000,000.00;
(iv) implicates a serious failure of State government oversight or
accountability;
(v) arises from previously enacted legislation; or
(vi) constitutes a failure to adequately respond to State or federal
audits.
(2) The Committee shall, with coordination from the Legislative
Committee on Administrative Rules, evaluate executive entities directed to
adopt rules to ensure consistency and accountability in the rulemaking process.
(3) The Committee shall, on an annual basis, issue a report that
includes:
(A) which issues of significant public concern the Committee has
examined and investigated, including relevant information and data;
(B) the Committee’s current objectives for review of issues of
significant public concern and which objectives, to date, have and have not
been met;
(C) the Committee’s objectives for review of issues of significant
public concern for the upcoming two years; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 6 of 14
(D) any additional resources required by the Committee to
adequately conduct its work.
(b) Powers. The Committee shall have powers as described in this section
and elsewhere in law. The Committee may take or cause depositions to be
taken as needed in any investigation or hearing.
Sec. 3. FIRST ANNUALREPORT OF THE JOINT GOVERNMENT
OVERSIGHT AND ACCOUNTABILITY COMMITTEE
The Joint Government Oversight and Accountability Committee shall
include in its first annual report required by 2 V.S.A. § 972(a)(3) an analysis of
whether the General Assembly should empower the Committee to issue
subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with its examination and
investigation of matters of government oversight and accountability related to
issues of significant public concern. The Committee shall also include in its
report a recommendation for whether the General Assembly should add a staff
member dedicated to supporting the Committee in its work.
* * * Chief Performance Officer Annual Report * * *
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 2311 is amended to read:
§ 2311. CHIEF PERFORMANCE OFFICER; ANNUALSTATE
OUTCOMES REPORT
* * *
(c) Approving population-level indicators.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 7 of 14
(1) Annually, on or before March 1, a standing committee of the
General Assembly having jurisdiction over a population-level quality of life
outcome set forth in subsection (b) of this section or the Chief Performance
Officer may submit to the Joint Government Oversight and Accountability
Committee a request that any population-level indicator related to that
outcome be revised.
(2) If that request is approved by the Joint Government Oversight and
Accountability Committee, the Chief Performance Officer shall revise and
report on the population-level indicator in accordance with that approval and
this section.
(d) The report set forth in this section shall not be subject to the limitation
on the duration of agency reports set forth in 2 V.S.A. § 20(d).
* * * Auditor of Accounts Duties * * *
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 163 is amended to read:
§ 163. DUTIES OF THE AUDITOR OF ACCOUNTS
In addition to any other duties prescribed by law, the Auditor of Accounts
shall:
* * *
(6)(A) Provide the Joint Government Oversight and Accountability
Committee with a written summary of all audits completed by the Office of the
Auditor of Accounts.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 8 of 14
(B) Upon the request of the Joint Government Oversight and
Accountability Committee, provide, at the mutual convenience of the
Committee and Auditor, a presentation to the Committee of any completed
audit.
* * *
Sec. 6. ANNUALAUDIT OF AGENCY PROGRAMS; PILOT
On or before November 15, in the years 2026, 2028, and 2030, the Auditor
of Accounts shall submit a written report to the Joint Government Oversight
and Accountability Committee concerning the periodic audit of administrative
programs operated by State agencies. The Auditor of Accounts shall select not
more than five programs to study during a given two-year reporting period and
shall examine the efficiency and outcomes of the selected programs, including
an analysis of the performance measures for each program and whether the
outcomes align with program objectives and goals.
* * * Periodic Reports * * *
Sec. 7. 2 V.S.A. § 20 is amended to read:
§ 20. LIMITATION ON DISTRIBUTION AND DURATION OF AGENCY
REPORTS
(a) Unless otherwise provided by law, whenever it is required by statute,
rule, or otherwise that an agency, department, or other entity submit an annual,
biennial, or other periodic report to the General Assembly, that requirement

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 9 of 14
shall be met by submission by January November 15 of copies of the report for
activities in the preceding fiscal year to the Clerk of the House, the Secretary
of the Senate, the Office of Legislative Counsel Operations, chairs of
legislative standing committees of jurisdiction, and such individual members
of the General Assembly or committees that specifically request a copy of the
report. To the extent practicable, reports Reports shall also be placed
published on the agency’s Internet website. No general distribution or mailing
of such reports shall be made to members of the General Assembly.
* * *
(e) If it becomes apparent to any agency, department, or other entity
directed by the General Assembly to report on a matter that the agency,
department, or entity will be unable to do so within the required time, the
reporting agency, department, or entity shall inform, if applicable, the relevant
legislative committee’s current chair, the committee assistant, and the Office of
Legislative Operations of which report will be late, why, and when it will be
delivered.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 10 of 14
* * * Purpose and Findings * * *
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to advance the principle of government
accountability by examining how evidence is used to inform policy, how State
laws are implemented, and how legislation may be structured to achieve its
intended outcomes. This act seeks to support consistent and transparent
accountability practices through simple, clear, independent, objective, and
fact-based processes.
* * * Pilot Government Accountability Project * * *
Sec. 2. PILOT GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY PROJECT
(a) Assignment. The Joint Fiscal Committee shall, in addition to its other
duties described in law and rules, conduct the Pilot Government
Accountability Project to examine governmental practices, make
recommendations on improving those practices, and develop effective tools for
evaluating government accountability.
(b) Selection of Project issues before the Committee. The Chief Fiscal
Officer of the Joint Fiscal Office, in consultation with the Speaker of the
House, and the President Pro Tempore, and the leaders of the major political
parties in both the House and the Senate, will select issues for the Committee’s
consideration and refer these to the Joint Fiscal Committee on or before
August 1, 2026.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 11 of 14
(c) Charge. The Committee is charged with completing, to the extent
feasible, Project elements as described in this section.
(1) Examination of issues selected by Committee. The Committee shall
be empowered to examine, investigate, and otherwise analyze issues that it
selects pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(2) Review of program performance. The Committee shall examine
whether State programs and initiatives are advancing the policy goals
established in statute, including consideration of outcome data,
implementation progress, and operational challenges.
(3) Consideration of evidence and evaluation. The Committee shall
review available research, independent evaluations, audits, and performance
measures relevant to State programs and policies and encourage the use of
reliable data and evaluation methods in legislative decision making.
(4) Identification of effective practices and improvement opportunities.
The Committee shall highlight approaches that demonstrate positive outcomes,
identify barriers to effective implementation, and recommend reasonable
opportunities for improvement, coordination, or replication where appropriate.
(5) Support for alignment of policy, funding, and outcomes. The
Committee shall provide information and recommendations that assist the
General Assembly in aligning appropriations, statutory intent, and measurable
results.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 12 of 14
(6) Monitoring of follow-up actions. The Committee shall, when issuing
recommendations, request updates from relevant agencies regarding actions
taken or progress made, as appropriate.
(7) Coordination with existing oversight entities. The Committee shall
work in consultation with legislative committees of jurisdiction, the State
Auditor, the Chief Performance Officer, and other relevant entities to avoid
duplication and to support efficient use of State resources.
(8) Surveying of data and data impact. The Committee shall survey
available State data and documented impacts to better understand
implementation, outcomes, and opportunities for improvement.
(9) Communication of outcomes. The Committee shall consider how
and when program outcomes and performance information are communicated,
including the audiences receiving such information and the clarity, timeliness,
and usefulness of the communication for supporting transparency, public
understanding, and informed decision making.
(10) Development of evaluation tools. The Committee may consider the
development or use of appropriate tools and methods to assess program
outcomes and performance, including measures that support consistent
evaluation, transparency, and informed legislative and administrative decision
making.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 13 of 14
(d) Report. On or before December 15, 2026, and again on or before
November 15, 2027, the Committee shall present and submit a written report to
the House Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the
Senate Committee on Government Operations that includes any findings on the
issues examined and any recommendations for legislative action.
* * * Joint Fiscal Office Consultant; Appropriation * * *
Sec. 3. JOINT FISCAL OFFICE CONSULTANT; APPROPRIATION
(a) Committee personnel. The Joint Fiscal Office may, to conduct research
and analysis and to provide other support as necessary for the Pilot
Government Accountability Project, either:
(1) contract with a consultant for a two-year term; or
(2) create a new exempt temporary service position for a two-year term.
(b) Appropriation. There is appropriated to the Joint Fiscal Office from
the General Fund in fiscal year 2027 the sum of $150,000.00 for Pilot
Government Accountability Project personnel.
Sec. 3. LEGISLATIVE JOINT FISCAL OFFICE CONSULTANT
(a) Committee personnel. The Legislative Joint Fiscal Office may, to
conduct research and analysis and to provide other support as necessary for
the Pilot Government Accountability Project, either:
(1) contract with a consultant for a two-year term; or
(2) create a new exempt limited service position for a two-year term.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.67
2025 Page 14 of 14
(b) Appropriation. There is appropriated to the Legislative Joint Fiscal
Office from the General Fund in fiscal year 2027 the sum of $300,000.00, to
be used for Pilot Government Accountability Project personnel over a two-
year period.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.